Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.320

Authority of legislative ethics board.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5143-S.SL) ***

(1) The legislative ethics board shall enforce this chapter and rules adopted under it with respect to members and employees of the legislature.

(2) The legislative ethics board shall:

(a) Develop educational materials and training with regard to legislative ethics for legislators and legislative employees;

(b) Issue advisory opinions;

(c) Adopt rules or policies governing the conduct of business by the board, and adopt rules defining working hours for purposes of RCW 42.52.180 and where otherwise authorized under chapter 154, Laws of 1994;

(d) Investigate, hear, and determine complaints by any person or on its own motion;

(e) Impose sanctions including reprimands and monetary penalties;

(f) Recommend suspension or removal to the appropriate legislative entity, or recommend prosecution to the appropriate authority; and

(g) Establish criteria regarding the levels of civil penalties appropriate for different types of violations of this chapter and rules adopted under it.

(3) The board may:

(a) Issue subpoenas for the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of documentary evidence relating to any matter under examination by the board or involved in any hearing;

(b) Administer oaths and affirmations;

(c) Examine witnesses; and

(d) Receive evidence.

(4) Subject to RCW 42.52.540, the board has jurisdiction over any alleged violation that occurred before January 1, 1995, and that was within the jurisdiction of any of the boards established under *chapter 44.60 RCW. The board's jurisdiction with respect to any such alleged violation shall be based on the statutes and rules in effect at [the] time of the violation.

[ 1994 c 154 s 202.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 44.60 RCW was repealed by 1994 c 154 s 304, effective January 1, 1995.